Wisconsin, session 2025, AB83.
do enact as follows:AB83,14Section 1. 20.931 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB83,1,5520.931 (title) Prohibited boycotts governmental actions.AB83,26Section 2. 20.931 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB83,2,2120.931 (1) (am) “Motor vehicle” means a self-propelled device designed to 2transport persons or property from one place to another.AB83,33Section 3. 20.931 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB83,2,5420.931 (3) Prohibitions based on energy source. No state agency and no 5local governmental unit may do any of the following:AB83,2,86(a) 1. Restrict the use or sale of a motor vehicle on the basis of the energy 7source used to power the motor vehicle, including use for propulsion or use for 8powering other functions of the motor vehicle.AB83,2,1192. This paragraph does not affect any policy established by a state agency or 10local governmental unit related to the purchase of motor vehicles for the use of the 11state agency or local governmental unit.AB83,2,1612(b) Restrict the use or sale of a device other than a motor vehicle on the basis 13of the energy source that is used to power the device or that is consumed by the 14device. Under this paragraph, a device is powered by an energy source or consumes 15an energy source if any significant function of the device uses that energy source or 16consumes that energy source to accomplish the function.AB83,2,1717